Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.110

Appeals.

The provisions contained in chapter 51.52 RCW relating to appeals shall govern appeals under this chapter: PROVIDED, That no provision contained in chapter 51.52 RCW concerning employers as parties to any settlement, appeal, or other action shall apply to this chapter: PROVIDED FURTHER, That appeals taken from a decision of the board of industrial insurance appeals under this chapter shall be governed by the provisions relating to judicial review of administrative decisions contained in RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, and the department shall have the same right of review from a decision of the board of industrial insurance appeals as does the claimant: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the time in which to file a protest or appeal from any order, decision, or award under this chapter shall be ninety days from the date the order, decision, or award is communicated to the parties.

[ 1997 c 102 s 1; 1989 c 175 s 40; 1977 ex.s. c 302 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 176 s 5; 1973 1st ex.s. c 122 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.